Maryland, session 2026, HB1514.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article 5 – Calvert County
2–101.
(a) Five County Commissioners comprise the Board of County Commissioners of
Calvert County.
(b) (1) The annual salary of the president of the Board is[:
(I) $44,500 for calendar year 2018;
(II) $46,000 for calendar year 2019;
(III) $47,500 for calendar year 2020;
(IV) $49,000 for calendar year 2021; and
(V) $50,500 for calendar year 2022 and each subsequent calendar
year] $58,000.
(2) The annual salary of each of the associate members of the Board is[:
(I) $42,000 for calendar year 2018;
(II) $43,500 for calendar year 2019;
(III) $45,000 for calendar year 2020;
(IV) $46,500 for calendar year 2021; and
(V) $48,000 for calendar year 2022 and each subsequent calendar
year] $53,000.
(c) Each Commissioner may be reimbursed up to an annual total of $2,000, for
any reasonable costs incurred by the Commissioner in carrying out the functions of the
office.
(d) A Commissioner may participate in the Calvert County Employees
Retirement Savings Plan.
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 574
(E) AFTER 10 YEARS OF SERVICE AS A COMMISSIONER, REGARDLESS OF
AGE, A FORMER COMMISSIONER MAY RECEIVE BENEFITS UNDER THE COUNTY
RETIREE HEALTH BENEFITS PROGRAM.
Article – Criminal Procedure
15–405.
(a) This section applies only in Calvert County.
(b) [(1)] The State’s Attorney’s salary is equal to the salary of a circuit court
judge.
[(2) A salary increase shall take effect at the beginning of the elected term
of office and may not increase during the term of office.]
Article – Education
3–303.
(a) At its first meeting at the beginning of each calendar year, the county board
shall elect a president and a vice president from among its members.
(b) (1) The president of the county board is entitled to receive:
(I) $6,500 [annually] as compensation [and the] FOR CALENDAR
YEAR 2026; AND
(II) $8,500 AS COMPENSATION FOR CALENDAR YEAR 2027 AND
EACH SUBSEQUENT CALENDAR YEAR.
(2) THE other members OF THE COUNTY BOARD are entitled to receive:
(I) $5,500 [each annually] as compensation FOR CALENDAR YEAR
2026; AND
(II) $7,500 AS COMPENSATION FOR CALENDAR YEAR 2027 AND
EACH SUBSEQUENT CALENDAR YEAR.
[(2)] (3) An elected member is entitled to health insurance benefits
regularly provided to employees of the board of education under the same terms and
conditions extended to other employees of the board of education.
Article – Local Government
– 3 –

Ch. 574 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
16–202.
(a) The annual salary of the County Treasurer of Calvert County is [$57,500]
$115,000.
(b) (1) The County Treasurer of Calvert County shall appoint one deputy
treasurer.
(2) The County Commissioners of Calvert County shall set the annual
salary of the deputy treasurer.
(c) (1) [An] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS
SUBSECTION:
(I) AN individual who serves as County Treasurer of Calvert County
for at least three terms shall receive an annual pension when the individual leaves office
of $150 for each year served[.
(2) The]; AND
(II) THE pension shall be paid at least once per month.
(2) BEGINNING WITH THE TERM OF OFFICE THAT BEGINS ON OR
AFTER NOVEMBER 4, 2026, AN INDIVIDUAL WHO SERVES AS COUNTY TREASURER
OF CALVERT COUNTY SHALL RECEIVE THE SAME PENSION BENEFITS AS COUNTY
EMPLOYEES.
(d) The County Commissioners of Calvert County shall:
(1) provide in its annual budget a pension of $150 per month to be paid to
the surviving spouse of any county treasurer who served as of October 1974; and
(2) pay the pension for the life of the surviving spouse.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, in accordance with Article
III, § 35 of the Maryland Constitution, this Act may not be construed to extend or apply to
the salary or compensation of the County Commissioners of Calvert County, the president
and members of the Calvert County Board of Education, or the County Treasurer of Calvert
County while serving in a term of office beginning before the effective date of this Act, but
the provisions of this Act concerning the salary or compensation of the County
Commissioners of Calvert County, the president and members of the Calvert County Board
of Education, or the County Treasurer of Calvert County shall take effect at the beginning
of the next following term of office. This limitation does not apply to an individual appointed
or elected after the effective date of this Act to fill out an unexpired term.
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 574
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, May 12, 2026.
– 5 –